Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
342D

WATER
POLLUTION

Part I. Definitions and General Provisions

Section

342D-1 Definitions

342D-2 Administration

342D-3 Board membership

342D-4 Duties; rules

342D-5 Rules; specific

342D-6 Permits; procedures for

342D-6.5 Hawaiian loko i‘a

342D-7 Variances

342D-8 Inspection of premises

342D-9 Enforcement

342D-10 Emergency powers; procedures

342D-11 Injunctive and other relief

342D-12 Appeal

342D-13 Fees

342D-14 Public records; confidential information; penalties

342D-15 Nonliability of department personnel

342D-16 Remedies preserved

342D-17 Enforcement by state and county
authorities

342D-18 Other powers of department not affected

342D-19 Effect of laws, ordinances, and rules

342D-20 Priority in courts

Part II. Penalties

342D-30 Civil penalties

342D-31 Administrative penalties

342D-32 Negligent violations

342D-33 Knowing violations

342D-34 Knowing endangerment

342D-35 False statements

342D-36 Treatment of single operational upset

342D-37 Responsible corporate officer as "person"

342D-38 Hazardous substance defined

342D-39 Disposition of collected fines and
penalties

Part III. Water Pollution Control

342D-50 Prohibition

342D-51 Affirmative duty to report discharges

342D-52 Testing of water and aquatic and other
life

342D-53 Certifying agency

342D-54 Wastewater treatment works; financial
assistance;

grants

342D-55 Recordkeeping and monitoring requirements

342D-56 Complaints; hearings; appointment of
masters

342D-57 Public participation activities;
appointment of

hearings officers

342D-58 Consultation and advice

342D-59 Research, educational, and training
programs

342D-60 Annual reports

Part IV. Miscellaneous Provisions

342D-70 Use of gray water for irrigation purposes

342D-71 Recycled water use

Part V. Water Pollution Control Financing

342D-80 Definitions

342D-81 Declaration of policy

342D-82 Powers and duties

342D-82.5 Use of American Recovery and Reinvestment
Act of 2009

and other federal moneys

342D-83 Revolving fund; establishment, purposes,
coordination

342D-84 Revolving fund; uses

342D-85 Revolving fund; deposits

342D-86 Revolving fund; fees, interest, and
investment on

accounts

342D-87 Revolving fund; conditions

342D-88 Revenue bonds; authorization

342D-89 Revenue bonds; payment and security

342D-90 Revenue bonds; amount issued

342D-91 Revenue bonds; investment of proceeds, and
redemption

342D-92 Trustee; designation; duties

342D-93 Trust indenture

Part VI. Discharges from Commercial
Passenger Vessels

342D-101 Definitions

342D-102 Prohibited discharges; limitations on
discharges

342D-103 Prohibited air emissions

342D-104 Information-gathering requirements

342D-105 Recordkeeping requirements

342D-106 Reporting requirements

342D-107 Memorandum of understanding; recognition
program

342D-108 Exemption for vessels in innocent passage

342D-109 Activities of the department

342D-110 Fine schedules for illegal discharges

342D-111 Alternative terms and conditions of vessel
discharges

Note

Department of transportation's bridge rehabilitation and
replacement program; temporary exemption from certain construction requirements
of this chapter through June 30, 2017 or until completion. L 2012, c 218.

Total maximum daily load coordinator positions. L 2009, c
98, §6.

Cross References

Environmental courts, jurisdiction over proceedings arising
under this chapter, see §604A-2.

Nonpoint source pollution management and control, see chapter
342E.

Law Journals and Reviews

Liability Insurance Coverage for Pollution Claims. 12 UH L.
Rev. 83.

Enforcement of Environmental Laws in Hawai‘i. 16 UH L. Rev.
85.

Ala Loop and the Private Right of Action Under Hawai‘i
Constitution Article XI, Section 9: Charting a Path Toward a Cohesive
Enforcement Scheme. 33 UH L. Rev. 367 (2010).

Case Notes

Department of health's (DOH) duties under the public trust
doctrine requires the DOH to not only issue permits after prescribed measures
appear to be in compliance with state regulation, but also to ensure that the
prescribed measures are actually being implemented after a thorough assessment
of the possible adverse impacts the development would have on the State's
natural resources; this duty is consistent with the constitutional mandate
under article XI, §1 of the Hawaii constitution and the duties imposed upon the
DOH by this chapter and chapter 342E. 111 H. 205, 140 P.3d 985.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next